Hawaii statutes.
[§431:21-118] Status of association
policies. All financial institutions shall consider a policy issued by the
association to be the same as a similar policy issued by an insurer authorized
to transact insurance in this State. [L 1991, c 284, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next